Hawaii statutes.
§149A-20 Seizures; "stop-sale"
and "removal from sale" orders. (a) Any pesticide or device
that is distributed, sold, offered for sale, transported, or delivered for
transportation in violation of this chapter, may be seized. Any pesticide
product or device seized hereunder shall, after entry of decree, be disposed of
by destruction or sale as the court directs and the proceeds, if the pesticide
product or device is sold, less legal costs, shall be paid to the general fund
of the State; provided that the pesticide product or device shall not be sold
contrary to this chapter; and provided that upon payment of costs and execution
and delivery of a good and sufficient bond conditioned that the pesticide
product or device shall not be disposed of unlawfully, the court may direct the
pesticide product or device to be delivered to the owner thereof for relabeling
or reprocessing as the case may be.

(b) The chairperson or the chairperson's
authorized agent may issue and enforce a written or printed "stop-sale"
or "removal from sale" order to withhold from sale any pesticide or
device that is distributed, sold, offered for sale, transported, or delivered
for transportation in violation of this chapter. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am L
1975, c 126, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 310, §12]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next